Indiana, session 2026, HB1083.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-23-2-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) The department shall take action necessary
under this article to construct one (1) or more additional lanes of
traffic across Indiana for:
(1) eastbound; and
(2) westbound;
Interstate Highway 70 in areas of Interstate Highway 70 where
there are four (4) lanes of traffic.
(b) There is continuously appropriated from the state general
fund to the department an amount sufficient to pay for
construction and other associated costs paid or incurred under this
section.
2026 IN 1083—LS 6197/DI 129